Washington statutes.
RCW 41.54.900

Effective dates—1987 c 192.

(1) Section 5 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1987.

(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect on July 1, 1988.

[ 1987 c 192 s 11.]